Louisiana, session 2026, SB381.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1865(A) and 1868.1(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 22:1868.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1865. Appeals; maximum allowable costs
A.(1) The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide a reasonable
administrative appeal procedure to allow pharmacies to challenge maximum
allowable costs for a specific NDC or NDCs as not meeting the requirements of this
Subpart or being below the cost at which the pharmacy may obtain the NDC. Within
fifteen business days after the applicable fill date, a pharmacy may file an appeal by
following the appeal process as provided for in this Subpart. The pharmacy benefit
manager shall respond to a challenge within fifteen business days after receipt of the
challenge.
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-246 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 381
(2) The administrative appeal procedure shall allow a pharmacy or
pharmacist the option to submit a consolidated appeal representing multiple
substantially similar claims.
* * *
§1868.1. Pharmacy benefit manager rebate retention restrictions; fee disclosure
A.(1) A pharmacy benefit manager may negotiate, but shall not retain any
portion of rebates received from a drug manufacturer. All manufacturer rebates shall
be passed through to the plan sponsor as shared savings in the form of lower
premiums, reduced cost-sharing including reduced copays, coinsurance, or
deductibles for prescription drugs, or to provide broader drug coverage. The specific
allocation of rebates and how they are shared with plan members shall be identified
in the plan sponsor's plan design and contract terms.
(2) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not obtain a rebate, or any other
incentive or inducement including but not limited to discounts, on a name brand
drug in exchange for not placing other name brand drugs, biosimilars, generic
drugs, or any other drug in the same class of drugs on the PBM formulary.
* * *
§1868.2. Pharmacy benefit manager formularies
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Affiliated manufacturer" means a drug or biological product
manufacturer that, either directly or indirectly through one or more
intermediaries, meets one or more of the following criteria:
(a) Has an investment or ownership interest in a pharmacy benefit
manager.
(b) Shares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager.
(c) Has an investor or a holder of an ownership interest in a pharmacy
benefit manager.
(2) "Biological product" has the same meaning as in the Public Health
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-246 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 381
Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 262.
(3) "Biosimilar" has the same meaning as in the Public Health Service
Act, 42 U.S.C. 262.
(4) "Interchangeable" has the same meaning as in the Public Health
Service Act, 42 U.S.C. 262.
B.(1) A pharmacy benefit manager revising the formulary of covered
prescription drugs at the beginning of a plan year shall provide a sixty day
continuity-of-care period in which the covered prescription drug that is being
revised from the formulary continues to be provided at the same cost for the
insured for a period of sixty days.
(2) The sixty day continuity-of-care period commences upon notification
to the insured by the insurer.
(3) This Subsection does not apply if any of the following have occurred
regarding the covered prescription drug:
(a) The prescription drug has been made available over the counter by
the United States Food and Drug Administration and has entered the
commercial market as such.
(b) The prescription drug has been removed or withdrawn from the
commercial market by the manufacturer.
(c) The prescription drug is subject to an involuntary recall by state or
federal authorities and is no longer available on the commercial market.
B. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require an insured to receive
a drug or biological product that is manufactured by an affiliated manufacturer
when there is an available generically equivalent drug, or an available biological
product that is biosimilar to and interchangeable for the prescribed biological
product.
C. A pharmacy benefit manager shall not require an insured to receive
a more expensive name brand drug when less expensive name brand drugs,
biosimilars, generic drugs, or any other drug in the same class of drugs are
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-246 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 381
available.
D. Other than at the time of coverage renewal, a pharmacy benefit
manager shall not, while an insured is taking a prescription drug, do any of the
following:
(1) Remove the prescription drug from its list of covered drugs during
the policy year unless any of the following have occurred:
(a) The United States Food and Drug Administration has issued a
statement about the drug which calls into question the clinical safety of the
drug.
(b) The manufacturer of the drug has notified the United States Food
and Drug Administration of a manufacturing discontinuance or potential
discontinuance of the drug as required by the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act, 21 U.S.C. 356.
(c) The drug has been approved and made available over the counter by
the United States Food and Drug Administration and entered the commercial
market as such.
(2) Reclassify the drug to a more restrictive drug tier or increase the
amount that an insured must pay for a copayment, coinsurance, or deductible
for prescription drug benefits, or reclassify the drug to a higher cost-sharing
tier during the policy year.
E. This Section does not prohibit the addition of prescription drugs to the
formulary during the policy year.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-246 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 381